Utah statutes.
58-37c-11.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.

(1) A person who violates the unlawful conduct provision defined in Subsections 58-37c-3(11)(a) through (j) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(2) A person who violates the unlawful conduct provisions defined in Subsection 58-37c-3(11)(k) is guilty of a second degree felony.



Amended by Chapter 262, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 413, 2013 General Session

